Massachusetts, session 194th, H17.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 29 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by inserting after section 2DDDDDD the following section:-
Section 2EEEEEE. There shall be established and set up on the books of the
commonwealth, a separate, non-budgeted special revenue fund known as the Office of the
Inspector General Recovery Fund, which shall be administered by the office of the inspector
general. The fund shall be credited with any monies payable to the inspector general from civil
recoveries, settlement funds, or recoupment of administrative and investigatory costs and may
earn and be credited interest.
Amounts credited to the fund shall be expended, without further appropriation, for the
office of the inspector general’s operational, administrative and investigatory purposes.
of 2

The unexpended balance in the fund at the end of a fiscal year shall remain available for
expenditure in subsequent fiscal years. No expenditure made from the fund shall cause the fund
to be in deficit at any point.
of 2